Wisconsin, session 2025, AB837.
do enact as follows:AB837,11Section 1. 980.08 (4) (dm) 1. c. of the statutes is amended to read:AB837,2,102980.08 (4) (dm) 1. c. If the person is a serious child sex offender, ensure that 3the person’s placement is into a residence that is not on a property adjacent to a 4property where a child’s primary residence exists. For the purpose of this 5subdivision, adjacent properties are properties that share a property line without 6regard to a public or private road or alley if the living quarters on each property are 7not more than 1,500 feet apart. A person is not in violation of a condition or rule of 8supervised release under sub. (7) (a) if a child establishes primary residence in a 9property adjacent to the person’s residence after the person is placed in the 10residence under this section.AB837,211Section 2. 980.08 (4) (fm) of the statutes is created to read:AB837,2,1612980.08 (4) (fm) When the department submits the plan to the court under par. 13(f), the department shall notify the county. Prior to the court’s approval under par. 14(g), the county shall conduct an assessment of the residential option to ensure that 15the residential option complies with par. (dm) and shall report to the court when it 16completes the assessment.AB837,317Section 3. 980.08 (4) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB837,3,1318980.08 (4) (g) The court shall review the plan submitted by the department 1under par. (f). If the details of the plan adequately meet the treatment needs of the 2individual and the safety needs of the community, then the court shall approve the 3plan and determine that supervised release is appropriate. If the details of the plan 4do not adequately meet the treatment needs of the individual or the safety needs of 5the community, including an assessment under par. (fm) that the residential option 6does not comply with par. (dm), then the court shall determine that supervised 7release is not appropriate or direct the preparation of another supervised release 8plan to be considered by the court under this paragraph. If the plan is inadequate 9under this paragraph due to the residential option, the court shall order the county 10to identify and arrange to lease another residential option and to prepare a new 11report under par. (dm). If the plan is inadequate under this paragraph due to the 12treatment options, the court shall order the department to prepare another plan 13under par. (f).AB837,414Section 4. Initial applicability.AB837,3,1615(1) This act first applies to plans that have not been approved under s. 980.08 16(4) (g) on the effective date of this subsection.AB837,3,1717